District of Columbia statutes.
28:2A-203

Seals inoperative.

The affixing of a seal to a writing evidencing a lease contract or an offer to enter into a lease contract does not render the writing a sealed instrument and the law with respect to sealed instruments does not apply to the lease contract or offer.

July 22, 1992, D.C. Law 9-128, § 2(b), 39 DCR 3830

History

1981 Ed., § 28:2A-203.

Prior Codifications

Uniform Commercial Code Comment

Uniform Statutory Source:Section 2-203.

Changes: Revised to reflect leasing practices and terminology.

Definitional Cross References: “Lease contract”. Section 2A-103(1)(l).

“Writing”. Section 1-201(46).